Illinois, session 104th, HB4423.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 521B-25 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/21B-25)7    Sec. 21B-25. Endorsement on licenses. All licenses issued 8under paragraph (1) of Section 21B-20 of this Code shall be 9specifically endorsed by the State Board of Education for each 10content area, school support area, and administrative area for 11which the holder of the license is qualified. Recognized 12institutions approved to offer educator preparation programs 13shall be trained to add endorsements to licenses issued to 14applicants who meet all of the requirements for the 15endorsement or endorsements, including passing any required 16tests. The State Superintendent of Education shall randomly 17audit institutions to ensure that all rules and standards are 18being followed for entitlement or when endorsements are being 19recommended.20        (1) The State Board of Education, in consultation with 21    the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, shall 22    establish, by rule, the grade level and subject area 23    endorsements to be added to the Professional Educator   HB4423- 2 -LRB104 17502 LNS 30929 b1    License. These rules shall outline the requirements for 2    obtaining each endorsement.3        (2) In addition to any and all grade level and content 4    area endorsements developed by rule, the State Board of 5    Education, in consultation with the State Educator 6    Preparation and Licensure Board, shall develop the 7    requirements for the following endorsements:8            (A) (Blank).9            (B) Principal endorsement. A principal endorsement 10        shall be affixed to a Professional Educator License of 11        any holder who qualifies by having all of the 12        following:13                (i) Successful completion of a principal 14            preparation program approved in accordance with 15            Section 21B-60 of this Code and any applicable 16            rules.17                (ii) At least 4 total years of teaching or 4 18            total years of working in the capacity of school 19            support personnel in an Illinois public school or 20            nonpublic school recognized by the State Board of 21            Education, in a school under the supervision of 22            the Department of Corrections, or in an 23            out-of-state public school or out-of-state 24            nonpublic school meeting out-of-state recognition 25            standards comparable to those approved by the 26            State Superintendent of Education; however, the   HB4423- 3 -LRB104 17502 LNS 30929 b1            State Board of Education, in consultation with the 2            State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, 3            shall allow, by rules, for fewer than 4 years of 4            experience based on meeting standards set forth in 5            such rules, including without limitation a review 6            of performance evaluations or other evidence of 7            demonstrated qualifications.8                (iii) A master's degree or higher from a 9            regionally accredited college or university.10            (C) Chief school business official endorsement. A 11        chief school business official endorsement shall be 12        affixed to the Professional Educator License of any 13        holder who qualifies by having a master's degree or 14        higher, 2 years of full-time administrative experience 15        in school business management or 2 years of 16        university-approved practical experience, and a 17        minimum of 24 semester hours of graduate credit in a 18        program approved by the State Board of Education for 19        the preparation of school business administrators and 20        by passage of the applicable State tests. The chief 21        school business official endorsement may also be 22        affixed to the Professional Educator License of any 23        holder who qualifies by having a master's degree in 24        business administration, finance, accounting, or 25        public administration and who completes an additional 26        6 semester hours of internship in school business   HB4423- 4 -LRB104 17502 LNS 30929 b1        management from a regionally accredited institution of 2        higher education and passes the applicable State 3        tests. This endorsement shall be required for any 4        individual employed as a chief school business 5        official.6            (D) Superintendent endorsement. A superintendent 7        endorsement shall be affixed to the Professional 8        Educator License of any holder who has completed a 9        program approved by the State Board of Education for 10        the preparation of superintendents of schools, has had 11        at least 2 years of experience employed full-time in a 12        general administrative position or as a full-time 13        principal, director of special education, or chief 14        school business official in the public schools or in a 15        State-recognized nonpublic school in which the chief 16        administrator is required to have the licensure 17        necessary to be a principal in a public school in this 18        State and where a majority of the teachers are 19        required to have the licensure necessary to be 20        instructors in a public school in this State, and has 21        passed the required State tests; or of any holder who 22        has completed a program that is not an 23        Illinois-approved educator preparation program at an 24        Illinois institution of higher education and that has 25        recognition standards comparable to those approved by 26        the State Superintendent of Education and holds the   HB4423- 5 -LRB104 17502 LNS 30929 b1        general administrative, principal, or chief school 2        business official endorsement and who has had 2 years 3        of experience as a principal, director of special 4        education, or chief school business official while 5        holding a valid educator license or certificate 6        comparable in validity and educational and experience 7        requirements and has passed the appropriate State 8        tests, as provided in Section 21B-30 of this Code. The 9        superintendent endorsement shall allow individuals to 10        serve only as a superintendent or assistant 11        superintendent.12            (E) Teacher leader endorsement. It shall be the 13        policy of this State to improve the quality of 14        instructional leaders by providing a career pathway 15        for teachers interested in serving in leadership 16        roles, but not as principals. The State Board of 17        Education, in consultation with the State Educator 18        Preparation and Licensure Board, may issue a teacher 19        leader endorsement under this subdivision (E). Persons 20        who meet and successfully complete the requirements of 21        the endorsement shall be issued a teacher leader 22        endorsement on the Professional Educator License for 23        serving in schools in this State. Teacher leaders may 24        qualify to serve in such positions as department 25        chairs, coaches, mentors, curriculum and instruction 26        leaders, or other leadership positions as defined by   HB4423- 6 -LRB104 17502 LNS 30929 b1        the district. The endorsement shall be available to 2        those teachers who (i) hold a Professional Educator 3        License, (ii) hold a master's degree or higher from a 4        regionally accredited institution, (iii) have 5        completed a program of study that has been approved by 6        the State Board of Education, in consultation with the 7        State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, and 8        (iv) have successfully demonstrated competencies as 9        defined by rule.10            A teacher who meets the requirements set forth in 11        this Section and holds a teacher leader endorsement 12        may evaluate teachers pursuant to Section 24A-5 of 13        this Code, provided that the individual has completed 14        the evaluation component required by Section 24A-3 of 15        this Code and a teacher leader is allowed to evaluate 16        personnel under the respective school district's 17        collective bargaining agreement.18            The State Board of Education, in consultation with 19        the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, 20        may adopt such rules as may be necessary to establish 21        and implement the teacher leader endorsement program 22        and to specify the positions for which this 23        endorsement shall be required.24            (F) Special education endorsement. A special 25        education endorsement in one or more areas shall be 26        affixed to a Professional Educator License for any   HB4423- 7 -LRB104 17502 LNS 30929 b1        individual that meets those requirements established 2        by the State Board of Education in rules. Special 3        education endorsement areas shall include, without 4        limitation, the following:5                (i) Learning Behavior Specialist I;6                (ii) Learning Behavior Specialist II;7                (iii) Speech Language Pathologist;8                (iv) Blind or Visually Impaired;9                (v) Deaf-Hard of Hearing;10                (vi) Deaf-Hard of Hearing with Sign 11            Proficiency; 12                (vii) (vi) Early Childhood Special Education; 13            and14                (viii) (vii) Director of Special Education.15        Notwithstanding anything in this Code to the contrary, 16        the State Board of Education, in consultation with the 17        State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may 18        add additional areas of special education by rule.19            (G) School support personnel endorsement. School 20        support personnel endorsement areas shall include, but 21        are not limited to, school counselor, marriage and 22        family therapist, school psychologist, school speech 23        and language pathologist, school nurse, and school 24        social worker. This endorsement is for individuals who 25        are not teachers or administrators, but still require 26        licensure to work in an instructional support position   HB4423- 8 -LRB104 17502 LNS 30929 b1        in a public or State-operated elementary school, 2        secondary school, or cooperative or joint agreement 3        with a governing body or board of control or a charter 4        school operating in compliance with the Charter 5        Schools Law. The school support personnel endorsement 6        shall be affixed to the Professional Educator License 7        and shall meet all of the requirements established in 8        any rules adopted to implement this subdivision (G). 9        The holder of such an endorsement is entitled to all of 10        the rights and privileges granted holders of any other 11        Professional Educator License, including teacher 12        benefits, compensation, and working conditions.13(Source: P.A. 100-13, eff. 7-1-17; 100-267, eff. 8-22-17; 14100-288, eff. 8-24-17; 100-596, eff. 7-1-18; 100-780, eff. 151-1-19; 100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-220, 16eff. 8-7-19.)